Utah statutes.
78A-6-1105.   Expungement of juvenile court record -- Petition -- Procedure.
(1) (a)  A person who has been adjudicated under this chapter may petition the
court for the expungement of the person's juvenile court record and any
related records in the custody of a state agency, if:
(i)  the person has reached 18 years of age; and
(ii)  one year has elapsed from the date of termination of the continuing
jurisdiction of the juvenile court or, if the person was committed to a secure
youth corrections facility, one year from the date of the person's
unconditional release from the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice
Services.
(b)  The court may waive the requirements in Subsection (1)(a), if the court
finds, and states on the record, the reason why the waiver is appropriate.
(c)  The petitioner shall include in the petition any agencies known or
alleged to have any documents related to the offense for which expungement is
being sought.
(d)  The petitioner shall include with the petition the original criminal
history report obtained from the Bureau of Criminal Identification in
accordance with the provisions of Subsection 53-10-108(8).
(e)  The petitioner shall send a copy of the petition to the county attorney
or, if within a prosecution district, the district attorney.
(f) (i)  Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall:
(A)  set a date for a hearing;
(B)  notify the county attorney or district attorney, and the agency with
custody of the records at least 30 days prior to the hearing of the pendency
of the petition; and
(C)  notify the county attorney or district attorney, and the agency with
records the petitioner is asking the court to expunge of the date of the
hearing.
(ii)  The court shall provide a victim with the opportunity to request notice
of a petition for expungement.  A victim shall receive notice of a petition
for expungement at least 30 days prior to the hearing if, prior to the entry
of an expungement order, the victim or, in the case of a child or a person who
is incapacitated or deceased, the victim's next of kin or authorized
representative, submits a written and signed request for notice to the court
in the judicial district in which the crime occurred or judgment was entered.
The notice shall include a copy of the petition and statutes and rules
applicable to the petition.
(2) (a)  At the hearing, the county attorney or district attorney, a victim,
and any other person who may have relevant information about the petitioner
may testify.
(b)  In deciding whether to grant a petition for expungement, the court shall
consider whether the rehabilitation of the petitioner has been attained to the
satisfaction of the court, taking into consideration the petitioner's response
to programs and treatment, the petitioner's behavior subsequent to
adjudication, and the nature and seriousness of the conduct.
(c)  The court may order sealed all petitioner's records under the control of
the juvenile court and any of petitioner's records under the control of any
other agency or official pertaining to the petitioner's adjudicated juvenile
court cases, including relevant related records contained in the Management
Information System created by Section 62A-4a-1003 and the Licensing
Information System created by Section 62A-4a-1005, if the court finds that:
(i)  the petitioner has not, since the termination of the court's jurisdiction
or his unconditional release from the Division of Juvenile Justice Services,
been convicted of a:
(A)  felony; or
(B)  misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;
(ii)  no proceeding involving a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being
instituted against the petitioner; and
(iii)  a judgment for restitution entered by the court on the conviction for
which the expungement is sought has been satisfied.
(3)  The petitioner shall be responsible for service of the order of
expungement to all affected state, county, and local entities, agencies, and
officials.  To avoid destruction or sealing of the records in whole or in
part, the agency or entity receiving the expungement order shall only expunge
all references to the petitioner's name in the records pertaining to the
petitioner's adjudicated juvenile court cases.
(4)  Upon the entry of the order, the proceedings in the petitioner's case
shall be considered never to have occurred and the petitioner may properly
reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter.  Inspection of the records
may thereafter only be permitted by the court upon petition by the person who
is the subject of the records, and only to persons named in the petition.
(5)  The court may not expunge a juvenile court record if the record contains
an adjudication of:
(a)  Section 76-5-202, aggravated murder; or
(b)  Section 76-5-203, murder.
(6) (a)  A person whose juvenile court record consists solely of nonjudicial
adjustments as provided in Section 78A-6-602 may petition the court for
expungement of the person's record if the person:
(i)  has reached 18 years of age; and
(ii)  has completed the conditions of the nonjudicial adjustments.
(b)  The court shall, without a hearing, order sealed all petitioner's records
under the control of the juvenile court and any of petitioner's records under
the control of any other agency or official pertaining to the petitioner's
nonjudicial adjustments.
